Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-499
Tax received; credit to Highway Trust Fund; credits and refunds; balance to Highway Cash Fund.

Unless otherwise provided, all sums of money received under sections 66-489 and 66-4,105 by the State Treasurer shall be credited to the Highway Trust Fund. Credits and refunds of the tax provided for in such sections allowed to producers, suppliers, distributors, wholesalers, exporters, importers, or retailers shall be paid from the Highway Trust Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and refunds, shall be allocated to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 1925, c. 172, § 12, p. 453;

Laws 1929, c. 166, § 2, p. 574;

C.S.1929, § 66-411;

Laws 1933, c. 110, § 1, p. 446;

Laws 1937, c. 148, § 4, p. 568;

Laws 1939, c. 87, § 2, p. 359;

Laws 1941, c. 133, § 2, p. 524;

Laws 1941, c. 134, § 10, p. 535;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-411;

Laws 1943, c. 138, § 1(1), p. 470;

Laws 1943, c. 139, § 1(1), p. 477;

R.S.1943, § 66-421;

Laws 1947, c. 214, § 1, p. 696;

Laws 1969, c. 530, § 1, p. 2170;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 62, p. 2384;

Laws 1972, LB 1065, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 343, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 15;

Laws 1989, LB 258, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-421;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 25;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 18;

Laws 2008, LB846, § 8.